Utah statutes.
58-71-802.   Form of practice.

(1)  A naturopathic physician licensed under this chapter may engage in practice as a naturopathic physician, or in the practice of naturopathic medicine only as an individual licensee; but as an individual licensee, he may be:

(a)  an individual operating as a business proprietor;

(b)  an employee of another person;

(c)  a partner in a lawfully organized partnership;

(d)  a lawfully formed professional corporation;

(e)  a lawfully organized limited liability company;

(f)  a lawfully organized business corporation; or

(g)  any other form of organization recognized by the state which is not prohibited by rule adopted by division rules made in collaboration with the board.

(2)  Regardless of the form in which a licensee engages in the practice of medicine, the licensee may only permit the practice of medicine in that form of practice to be conducted by an individual:

(a)  licensed in Utah as a naturopathic physician under Section 58-71-301, a physician and surgeon, or as an osteopathic physician and surgeon; and

(b)  who is able to lawfully and competently engage in the practice of medicine.

